Hawaii statutes.
§121-24 Oaths and affirmations; false
swearing; perjury. (a) All commissioned officers of the army or air
national guard shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations in all
matters pertaining to or concerning military service or property, but in no
case shall they charge any fee therefor. Any person who falsely swears or
affirms to any oath or affirmation so administered may be tried before any
circuit court, and, upon conviction, shall be deemed guilty of perjury and
sentenced for such offense as prescribed by law.

(b) For purposes of initial entry into the
Hawaii national guard, any commissioned officer of the active or reserve
components of any of the armed forces of the United States shall have the power
to administer appropriate oaths and affirmations. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS
§121-24; am L 1988, c 52, §1]

Cross References

Perjury, see
§§710-1060 to 710-1069.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next